Utah statutes.
78B-4-103.   Liability protection for organizations.

A nonprofit organization is not liable for the acts or omissions of its volunteers in any circumstance where:

(1)  the acts of its volunteers are not as described in Subsection 78B-4-102(1) unless the nonprofit organization had, or reasonably should have had, reasonable notice of the volunteer's unfitness to provide services to the nonprofit organization under circumstances that make the nonprofit organization's use of the volunteer reckless or wanton in light of that notice; or

(2)  a business employer would not be liable under the laws of this state if the act or omission were the act or omission of one of its employees.

